Utah statutes.
58-37d-2.   Purpose.

The clandestine production of methamphetamine, other amphetamines, phencyclidine, narcotic analgesic analogs, so-called "designer drugs," various hallucinogens, cocaine and methamphetamine base "crack" cocaine and methamphetamine "ice" respectively, has increased dramatically throughout the western states and Utah.  These highly technical illegal operations create substantial dangers to the general public and environment from fire, explosions, and the release of toxic chemicals.  By their very nature these activities often involve a number of persons in a conspiratorial enterprise to bring together all necessary components for clandestine production, to thwart regulation and detection, and to distribute the final product.  Therefore, the Legislature enacts the following Utah Clandestine Laboratory Act for prosecution of specific illegal laboratory operations.  With regard to the controlled substances specified herein, this act shall control, notwithstanding the prohibitions and penalties in Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2013 General Session

